District of Columbia statutes.
18-704

International will; other points of form.

(a)

The signatures shall be placed at the end of the will. If the will consists of several sheets, each sheet shall be signed by the testator or, if he or she is unable to sign, by the person signing on his or her behalf or, if there is no such person, by the authorized person. In addition, each sheet shall be numbered.

(b)

The date of the will shall be the date of its signature by the authorized person. That date shall be noted at the end of the will by the authorized person.

(c)

The authorized person shall ask the testator whether he or she wishes to make a declaration concerning the safekeeping of his or her will. If so, and at the express request of the testator, the place where he or she intends to have his or her will kept shall be mentioned in the certificate provided for in section 18-705.

(d)

A will executed in compliance with section 18-703 shall not be invalid merely because it does not comply with this section.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087